Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.005

Finding—Intent.

The legislature finds that the cycle of recidivism warrants a closer examination of our criminal justice system, correctional systems, and community services in Washington. Over ninety-five percent of persons in prison will return to the community, and more than half of those persons will reoffend and be reincarcerated in today's system. This high rate of recidivism results in more crimes, more victims, more prisons, and more trauma within families and communities. We can do better for the people of Washington.

The legislature intends to establish the Washington statewide reentry council to develop collaborative and cooperative relationships between the criminal justice system, victims and their families, impacted individuals and their families, and service providers, with the purpose of improving public safety and outcomes for people reentering the community from incarceration.

[ 2016 c 188 s 1.]